Illinois, session 104th, HB4712.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Sections 11-74.4-7 and 11-74.4-8 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-74.4-7)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-74.4-7)7    Sec. 11-74.4-7. Obligations secured by the special tax 8allocation fund set forth in Section 11-74.4-8 for the 9redevelopment project area may be issued to provide for 10redevelopment project costs. Such obligations, when so issued, 11shall be retired in the manner provided in the ordinance 12authorizing the issuance of such obligations by the receipts 13of taxes levied as specified in Section 11-74.4-9 against the 14taxable property included in the area, by revenues as 15specified by Section 11-74.4-8a and other revenue designated 16by the municipality. A municipality may in the ordinance 17pledge all or any part of the funds in and to be deposited in 18the special tax allocation fund created pursuant to Section 1911-74.4-8 to the payment of the redevelopment project costs 20and obligations. Any pledge of funds in the special tax 21allocation fund shall provide for distribution to the taxing 22districts and to the Illinois Department of Revenue of moneys 23not required, pledged, earmarked, or otherwise designated for   HB4712- 2 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1payment and securing of the obligations and anticipated 2redevelopment project costs and such excess funds shall be 3calculated annually and deemed to be "surplus" funds. In the 4event a municipality only applies or pledges a portion of the 5funds in the special tax allocation fund for the payment or 6securing of anticipated redevelopment project costs or of 7obligations, any such funds remaining in the special tax 8allocation fund after complying with the requirements of the 9application or pledge, shall also be calculated annually and 10deemed "surplus" funds. Notwithstanding this Section, not more 11than 5% of all All surplus funds in the special tax allocation 12fund may shall be distributed not more than once every 10 13years, with the funds to be distributed annually within 180 14days after the close of the municipality's fiscal year by 15being paid by the municipal treasurer to the County Collector, 16to the Department of Revenue and to the municipality in direct 17proportion to the tax incremental revenue received as a result 18of an increase in the equalized assessed value of property in 19the redevelopment project area, tax incremental revenue 20received from the State and tax incremental revenue received 21from the municipality, but not to exceed as to each such source 22the total incremental revenue received from that source. The 23County Collector shall thereafter make distribution to the 24respective taxing districts in the same manner and proportion 25as the most recent distribution by the county collector to the 26affected districts of real property taxes from real property   HB4712- 3 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1in the redevelopment project area. If the termination date for 2the redevelopment project area is extended beyond the 23rd 3calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 4the redevelopment project area was adopted, then following the 523rd calendar year, no surplus funds may be distributed until 6the redevelopment project area is terminated. 7    Without limiting the foregoing in this Section, the 8municipality may in addition to obligations secured by the 9special tax allocation fund pledge for a period not greater 10than the term of the obligations towards payment of such 11obligations any part or any combination of the following: (a) 12net revenues of all or part of any redevelopment project; (b) 13taxes levied and collected on any or all property in the 14municipality; (c) the full faith and credit of the 15municipality; (d) a mortgage on part or all of the 16redevelopment project; (d-5) repayment of bonds issued 17pursuant to subsection (p-130) of Section 19-1 of the School 18Code; or (e) any other taxes or anticipated receipts that the 19municipality may lawfully pledge.20    Such obligations may be issued in one or more series 21bearing interest at such rate or rates as the corporate 22authorities of the municipality shall determine by ordinance. 23Such obligations shall bear such date or dates, mature at such 24time or times not exceeding 20 years from their respective 25dates, be in such denomination, carry such registration 26privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such   HB4712- 4 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1medium of payment at such place or places, contain such 2covenants, terms and conditions, and be subject to redemption 3as such ordinance shall provide. Obligations issued pursuant 4to this Act may be sold at public or private sale at such price 5as shall be determined by the corporate authorities of the 6municipalities. No referendum approval of the electors shall 7be required as a condition to the issuance of obligations 8pursuant to this Division except as provided in this Section.9    In the event the municipality authorizes issuance of 10obligations pursuant to the authority of this Division secured 11by the full faith and credit of the municipality, which 12obligations are other than obligations which may be issued 13under home rule powers provided by Article VII, Section 6 of 14the Illinois Constitution, or pledges taxes pursuant to (b) or 15(c) of the second paragraph of this section, the ordinance 16authorizing the issuance of such obligations or pledging such 17taxes shall be published within 10 days after such ordinance 18has been passed in one or more newspapers, with general 19circulation within such municipality. The publication of the 20ordinance shall be accompanied by a notice of (1) the specific 21number of voters required to sign a petition requesting the 22question of the issuance of such obligations or pledging taxes 23to be submitted to the electors; (2) the time in which such 24petition must be filed; and (3) the date of the prospective 25referendum. The municipal clerk shall provide a petition form 26to any individual requesting one.  HB4712- 5 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1    If no petition is filed with the municipal clerk, as 2hereinafter provided in this Section, within 30 days after the 3publication of the ordinance, the ordinance shall be in 4effect. But, if within that 30 day period a petition is filed 5with the municipal clerk, signed by electors in the 6municipality numbering 10% or more of the number of registered 7voters in the municipality, asking that the question of 8issuing obligations using full faith and credit of the 9municipality as security for the cost of paying for 10redevelopment project costs, or of pledging taxes for the 11payment of such obligations, or both, be submitted to the 12electors of the municipality, the corporate authorities of the 13municipality shall call a special election in the manner 14provided by law to vote upon that question, or, if a general, 15State or municipal election is to be held within a period of 16not less than 30 or more than 90 days from the date such 17petition is filed, shall submit the question at the next 18general, State or municipal election. If it appears upon the 19canvass of the election by the corporate authorities that a 20majority of electors voting upon the question voted in favor 21thereof, the ordinance shall be in effect, but if a majority of 22the electors voting upon the question are not in favor 23thereof, the ordinance shall not take effect.24    The ordinance authorizing the obligations may provide that 25the obligations shall contain a recital that they are issued 26pursuant to this Division, which recital shall be conclusive   HB4712- 6 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1evidence of their validity and of the regularity of their 2issuance.3    In the event the municipality authorizes issuance of 4obligations pursuant to this Section secured by the full faith 5and credit of the municipality, the ordinance authorizing the 6obligations may provide for the levy and collection of a 7direct annual tax upon all taxable property within the 8municipality sufficient to pay the principal thereof and 9interest thereon as it matures, which levy may be in addition 10to and exclusive of the maximum of all other taxes authorized 11to be levied by the municipality, which levy, however, shall 12be abated to the extent that monies from other sources are 13available for payment of the obligations and the municipality 14certifies the amount of said monies available to the county 15clerk.16    A certified copy of such ordinance shall be filed with the 17county clerk of each county in which any portion of the 18municipality is situated, and shall constitute the authority 19for the extension and collection of the taxes to be deposited 20in the special tax allocation fund.21    A municipality may also issue its obligations to refund in 22whole or in part, obligations theretofore issued by such 23municipality under the authority of this Act, whether at or 24prior to maturity, provided however, that the last maturity of 25the refunding obligations may not be later than the dates set 26forth under Section 11-74.4-3.5.  HB4712- 7 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1    In the event a municipality issues obligations under home 2rule powers or other legislative authority the proceeds of 3which are pledged to pay for redevelopment project costs, the 4municipality may, if it has followed the procedures in 5conformance with this division, retire said obligations from 6funds in the special tax allocation fund in amounts and in such 7manner as if such obligations had been issued pursuant to the 8provisions of this division.9    All obligations heretofore or hereafter issued pursuant to 10this Act shall not be regarded as indebtedness of the 11municipality issuing such obligations or any other taxing 12district for the purpose of any limitation imposed by law.13(Source: P.A. 100-531, eff. 9-22-17.) 14    (65 ILCS 5/11-74.4-8)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-74.4-8)15    Sec. 11-74.4-8. Tax increment allocation financing. A 16municipality may not adopt tax increment financing in a 17redevelopment project area after July 30, 1997 (the effective 18date of Public Act 90-258) that will encompass an area that is 19currently included in an enterprise zone created under the 20Illinois Enterprise Zone Act unless that municipality, 21pursuant to Section 5.4 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act, 22amends the enterprise zone designating ordinance to limit the 23eligibility for tax abatements as provided in Section 5.4.1 of 24the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act. A municipality, at the time 25a redevelopment project area is designated, may adopt tax   HB4712- 8 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1increment allocation financing by passing an ordinance 2providing that the ad valorem taxes, if any, arising from the 3levies upon taxable real property in such redevelopment 4project area by taxing districts and tax rates determined in 5the manner provided in paragraph (c) of Section 11-74.4-9 each 6year after the effective date of the ordinance until 7redevelopment project costs and all municipal obligations 8financing redevelopment project costs incurred under this 9Division have been paid shall be divided as follows, provided, 10however, that with respect to any redevelopment project area 11located within a transit facility improvement area established 12pursuant to Section 11-74.4-3.3 in a municipality with a 13population of 1,000,000 or more, ad valorem taxes, if any, 14arising from the levies upon taxable real property in such 15redevelopment project area shall be allocated as specifically 16provided in this Section:17        (a) That portion of taxes levied upon each taxable 18    lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property which is 19    attributable to the lower of the current equalized 20    assessed value or the initial equalized assessed value of 21    each such taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real 22    property in the redevelopment project area shall be 23    allocated to and when collected shall be paid by the 24    county collector to the respective affected taxing 25    districts in the manner required by law in the absence of 26    the adoption of tax increment allocation financing.  HB4712- 9 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1        (b) Except from a tax levied by a township to retire 2    bonds issued to satisfy court-ordered damages, that 3    portion, if any, of such taxes which is attributable to 4    the increase in the current equalized assessed valuation 5    of each taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real 6    property in the redevelopment project area over and above 7    the initial equalized assessed value of each property in 8    the project area shall be allocated to and when collected 9    shall be paid to the municipal treasurer who shall deposit 10    said taxes into a special fund called the special tax 11    allocation fund of the municipality for the purpose of 12    paying redevelopment project costs and obligations 13    incurred in the payment thereof. In any county with a 14    population of 3,000,000 or more that has adopted a 15    procedure for collecting taxes that provides for one or 16    more of the installments of the taxes to be billed and 17    collected on an estimated basis, the municipal treasurer 18    shall be paid for deposit in the special tax allocation 19    fund of the municipality, from the taxes collected from 20    estimated bills issued for property in the redevelopment 21    project area, the difference between the amount actually 22    collected from each taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel 23    of real property within the redevelopment project area and 24    an amount determined by multiplying the rate at which 25    taxes were last extended against the taxable lot, block, 26    tract, or parcel of real property in the manner provided   HB4712- 10 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1    in subsection (c) of Section 11-74.4-9 by the initial 2    equalized assessed value of the property divided by the 3    number of installments in which real estate taxes are 4    billed and collected within the county; provided that the 5    payments on or before December 31, 1999 to a municipal 6    treasurer shall be made only if each of the following 7    conditions are met:8            (1) The total equalized assessed value of the 9        redevelopment project area as last determined was not 10        less than 175% of the total initial equalized assessed 11        value.12            (2) Not more than 50% of the total equalized 13        assessed value of the redevelopment project area as 14        last determined is attributable to a piece of property 15        assigned a single real estate index number.16            (3) The municipal clerk has certified to the 17        county clerk that the municipality has issued its 18        obligations to which there has been pledged the 19        incremental property taxes of the redevelopment 20        project area or taxes levied and collected on any or 21        all property in the municipality or the full faith and 22        credit of the municipality to pay or secure payment 23        for all or a portion of the redevelopment project 24        costs. The certification shall be filed annually no 25        later than September 1 for the estimated taxes to be 26        distributed in the following year; however, for the   HB4712- 11 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1        year 1992 the certification shall be made at any time 2        on or before March 31, 1992.3            (4) The municipality has not requested that the 4        total initial equalized assessed value of real 5        property be adjusted as provided in subsection (b) of 6        Section 11-74.4-9.7        The conditions of paragraphs (1) through (4) do not 8    apply after December 31, 1999 to payments to a municipal 9    treasurer made by a county with 3,000,000 or more 10    inhabitants that has adopted an estimated billing 11    procedure for collecting taxes. If a county that has 12    adopted the estimated billing procedure makes an erroneous 13    overpayment of tax revenue to the municipal treasurer, 14    then the county may seek a refund of that overpayment. The 15    county shall send the municipal treasurer a notice of 16    liability for the overpayment on or before the mailing 17    date of the next real estate tax bill within the county. 18    The refund shall be limited to the amount of the 19    overpayment.20        It is the intent of this Division that after July 29, 21    1988 (the effective date of Public Act 85-1142) a 22    municipality's own ad valorem tax arising from levies on 23    taxable real property be included in the determination of 24    incremental revenue in the manner provided in paragraph 25    (c) of Section 11-74.4-9. If the municipality does not 26    extend such a tax, it shall annually deposit in the   HB4712- 12 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1    municipality's Special Tax Increment Fund an amount equal 2    to 10% of the total contributions to the fund from all 3    other taxing districts in that year. The annual 10% 4    deposit required by this paragraph shall be limited to the 5    actual amount of municipally produced incremental tax 6    revenues available to the municipality from taxpayers 7    located in the redevelopment project area in that year if: 8    (a) the plan for the area restricts the use of the property 9    primarily to industrial purposes, (b) the municipality 10    establishing the redevelopment project area is a home rule 11    community with a 1990 population of between 25,000 and 12    50,000, (c) the municipality is wholly located within a 13    county with a 1990 population of over 750,000 and (d) the 14    redevelopment project area was established by the 15    municipality prior to June 1, 1990. This payment shall be 16    in lieu of a contribution of ad valorem taxes on real 17    property. If no such payment is made, any redevelopment 18    project area of the municipality shall be dissolved.19        If a municipality has adopted tax increment allocation 20    financing by ordinance and the County Clerk thereafter 21    certifies the "total initial equalized assessed value as 22    adjusted" of the taxable real property within such 23    redevelopment project area in the manner provided in 24    paragraph (b) of Section 11-74.4-9, each year after the 25    date of the certification of the total initial equalized 26    assessed value as adjusted until redevelopment project   HB4712- 13 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1    costs and all municipal obligations financing 2    redevelopment project costs have been paid the ad valorem 3    taxes, if any, arising from the levies upon the taxable 4    real property in such redevelopment project area by taxing 5    districts and tax rates determined in the manner provided 6    in paragraph (c) of Section 11-74.4-9 shall be divided as 7    follows, provided, however, that with respect to any 8    redevelopment project area located within a transit 9    facility improvement area established pursuant to Section 10    11-74.4-3.3 in a municipality with a population of 11    1,000,000 or more, ad valorem taxes, if any, arising from 12    the levies upon the taxable real property in such 13    redevelopment project area shall be allocated as 14    specifically provided in this Section:15            (1) That portion of the taxes levied upon each 16        taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property 17        which is attributable to the lower of the current 18        equalized assessed value or "current equalized 19        assessed value as adjusted" or the initial equalized 20        assessed value of each such taxable lot, block, tract, 21        or parcel of real property existing at the time tax 22        increment financing was adopted, minus the total 23        current homestead exemptions under Article 15 of the 24        Property Tax Code in the redevelopment project area 25        shall be allocated to and when collected shall be paid 26        by the county collector to the respective affected   HB4712- 14 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1        taxing districts in the manner required by law in the 2        absence of the adoption of tax increment allocation 3        financing.4            (2) That portion, if any, of such taxes which is 5        attributable to the increase in the current equalized 6        assessed valuation of each taxable lot, block, tract, 7        or parcel of real property in the redevelopment 8        project area, over and above the initial equalized 9        assessed value of each property existing at the time 10        tax increment financing was adopted, minus the total 11        current homestead exemptions pertaining to each piece 12        of property provided by Article 15 of the Property Tax 13        Code in the redevelopment project area, shall be 14        allocated to and when collected shall be paid to the 15        municipal Treasurer, who shall deposit said taxes into 16        a special fund called the special tax allocation fund 17        of the municipality for the purpose of paying 18        redevelopment project costs and obligations incurred 19        in the payment thereof.20        The municipality may pledge in the ordinance the funds 21    in and to be deposited in the special tax allocation fund 22    for the payment of such costs and obligations. No part of 23    the current equalized assessed valuation of each property 24    in the redevelopment project area attributable to any 25    increase above the total initial equalized assessed value, 26    or the total initial equalized assessed value as adjusted,   HB4712- 15 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1    of such properties shall be used in calculating the 2    general State aid formula, provided for in Section 18-8 of 3    the School Code, or the evidence-based funding formula, 4    provided for in Section 18-8.15 of the School Code, until 5    such time as all redevelopment project costs have been 6    paid as provided for in this Section.7        Whenever a municipality issues bonds for the purpose 8    of financing redevelopment project costs, such 9    municipality may provide by ordinance for the appointment 10    of a trustee, which may be any trust company within the 11    State, and for the establishment of such funds or accounts 12    to be maintained by such trustee as the municipality shall 13    deem necessary to provide for the security and payment of 14    the bonds. If such municipality provides for the 15    appointment of a trustee, such trustee shall be considered 16    the assignee of any payments assigned by the municipality 17    pursuant to such ordinance and this Section. Any amounts 18    paid to such trustee as assignee shall be deposited in the 19    funds or accounts established pursuant to such trust 20    agreement, and shall be held by such trustee in trust for 21    the benefit of the holders of the bonds, and such holders 22    shall have a lien on and a security interest in such funds 23    or accounts so long as the bonds remain outstanding and 24    unpaid. Upon retirement of the bonds, the trustee shall 25    pay over any excess amounts held to the municipality for 26    deposit in the special tax allocation fund.  HB4712- 16 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1        When such redevelopment projects costs, including, 2    without limitation, all municipal obligations financing 3    redevelopment project costs incurred under this Division, 4    have been paid, not more than 5% of all surplus funds then 5    remaining in the special tax allocation fund may shall be 6    distributed not more than once every 10 years by being 7    paid by the municipal treasurer to the Department of 8    Revenue, the municipality and the county collector; first 9    to the Department of Revenue and the municipality in 10    direct proportion to the tax incremental revenue received 11    from the State and the municipality, but not to exceed the 12    total incremental revenue received from the State or the 13    municipality less any annual surplus distribution of 14    incremental revenue previously made; with any remaining 15    funds to be paid to the County Collector who shall 16    immediately thereafter pay said funds to the taxing 17    districts in the redevelopment project area in the same 18    manner and proportion as the most recent distribution by 19    the county collector to the affected districts of real 20    property taxes from real property in the redevelopment 21    project area. If the termination date for the 22    redevelopment project area is extended beyond the 23rd 23    calendar year after the year in which the ordinance 24    approving the redevelopment project area was adopted, then 25    following the 23rd calendar year, no surplus funds may be 26    distributed until the redevelopment project area is   HB4712- 17 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1    terminated. 2        Upon the payment of all redevelopment project costs, 3    the retirement of obligations, the distribution of any 4    excess monies pursuant to this Section, and final closing 5    of the books and records of the redevelopment project 6    area, the municipality shall adopt an ordinance dissolving 7    the special tax allocation fund for the redevelopment 8    project area and terminating the designation of the 9    redevelopment project area as a redevelopment project 10    area. Title to real or personal property and public 11    improvements acquired by or for the municipality as a 12    result of the redevelopment project and plan shall vest in 13    the municipality when acquired and shall continue to be 14    held by the municipality after the redevelopment project 15    area has been terminated. Municipalities shall notify 16    affected taxing districts prior to November 1 if the 17    redevelopment project area is to be terminated by December 18    31 of that same year. If a municipality extends estimated 19    dates of completion of a redevelopment project and 20    retirement of obligations to finance a redevelopment 21    project, as allowed by Public Act 87-1272, that extension 22    shall not extend the property tax increment allocation 23    financing authorized by this Section. Thereafter the rates 24    of the taxing districts shall be extended and taxes 25    levied, collected and distributed in the manner applicable 26    in the absence of the adoption of tax increment allocation   HB4712- 18 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1    financing.2        If a municipality with a population of 1,000,000 or 3    more has adopted by ordinance tax increment allocation 4    financing for a redevelopment project area located in a 5    transit facility improvement area established pursuant to 6    Section 11-74.4-3.3, for each year after the effective 7    date of the ordinance until redevelopment project costs 8    and all municipal obligations financing redevelopment 9    project costs have been paid, the ad valorem taxes, if 10    any, arising from the levies upon the taxable real 11    property in that redevelopment project area by taxing 12    districts and tax rates determined in the manner provided 13    in paragraph (c) of Section 11-74.4-9 shall be divided as 14    follows:15            (1) That portion of the taxes levied upon each 16        taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property 17        which is attributable to the lower of (i) the current 18        equalized assessed value or "current equalized 19        assessed value as adjusted" or (ii) the initial 20        equalized assessed value of each such taxable lot, 21        block, tract, or parcel of real property existing at 22        the time tax increment financing was adopted, minus 23        the total current homestead exemptions under Article 24        15 of the Property Tax Code in the redevelopment 25        project area shall be allocated to and when collected 26        shall be paid by the county collector to the   HB4712- 19 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1        respective affected taxing districts in the manner 2        required by law in the absence of the adoption of tax 3        increment allocation financing.4            (2) That portion, if any, of such taxes which is 5        attributable to the increase in the current equalized 6        assessed valuation of each taxable lot, block, tract, 7        or parcel of real property in the redevelopment 8        project area, over and above the initial equalized 9        assessed value of each property existing at the time 10        tax increment financing was adopted, minus the total 11        current homestead exemptions pertaining to each piece 12        of property provided by Article 15 of the Property Tax 13        Code in the redevelopment project area, shall be 14        allocated to and when collected shall be paid by the 15        county collector as follows:16                (A) First, that portion which would be payable 17            to a school district whose boundaries are 18            coterminous with such municipality in the absence 19            of the adoption of tax increment allocation 20            financing, shall be paid to such school district 21            in the manner required by law in the absence of the 22            adoption of tax increment allocation financing; 23            then24                (B) 80% of the remaining portion shall be paid 25            to the municipal Treasurer, who shall deposit said 26            taxes into a special fund called the special tax   HB4712- 20 -LRB104 18094 RTM 31533 b1            allocation fund of the municipality for the 2            purpose of paying redevelopment project costs and 3            obligations incurred in the payment thereof; and 4            then5                (C) 20% of the remaining portion shall be paid 6            to the respective affected taxing districts, other 7            than the school district described in clause (a) 8            above, in the manner required by law in the 9            absence of the adoption of tax increment 10            allocation financing. 11    Nothing in this Section shall be construed as relieving 12property in such redevelopment project areas from being 13assessed as provided in the Property Tax Code or as relieving 14owners of such property from paying a uniform rate of taxes, as 15required by Section 4 of Article IX of the Illinois 16Constitution.17(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.